src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON нсв_6a_ать
нсв_нп_6a_ать ;
+V+Impf+TV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_ать_сыпать
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct ;
+V+Impf+IV: PresVrbAdv_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Imper_unstressed ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^M%<у PresAct ;
+V+Impf+TV: PresVrbAdv_mut_stem ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem_Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%<у PresAct_Pass ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs: PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_ать_R_сыпаться
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Imper_unstressed_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^M%<у PresAct_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: PresVrbAdv_mut_stem_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs: PresFut_сыпаться_Fac ;

LEXICON нсв_6a/1a_13
нсв_6a_ать ;
:а нсв_1a_13 ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a/1a_13
нсв_нп_6a_ать ;
:а нсв_нп_1a_13 ;

LEXICON нсв_6a/1a_13_R
нсв_6a_ать_R ;
:а нсв_1a_13_R ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_ать_R
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a_ать
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_а́ть
нсв_нп_6a_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_6a?_а́ть_имеется_прич._страд._наст.
нсв_6a?_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Mе PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_6a?_а́ть
нсв_нп_6a_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_а́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a_а́ть
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_ять
нсв_нп_6a_ять ;
+V+Impf+TV:я Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_6a_ять_R
+V+Impf+IV:я Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6a_ять
+V+Impf+IV:я Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать
св_6a?_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_Impи
св_6a?_ать_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_выслать
+V+Perf+IV:сла Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:шл Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:сла Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:шл Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:сла PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_R_-ехаться
+V+Perf+IV:ха Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:д Perf_Fut_1_stem_R_noImp ;

LEXICON св_1a_13_ать_R
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Fut_1_stem_13_R ;

LEXICON св_1a_13_ать
св_нп_1a_13_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Fut_1_stem_13 ;

LEXICON св_нп_1a_13_ать
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Fut_1_stem_13 ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_13
св_6a_ать ;
св_1a_13_ать ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_13_R
св_6a_ать_R ;
св_1a_13_ать_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a/1a_13
св_нп_6a_ать ;
св_нп_1a_13_ать ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_13_Impи
св_6a_ать_Impи ;
св_1a_13_ать ;

LEXICON св_6a/1a_13_R_Impи
св_6a_ать_R_Impи ;
св_1a_13_ать_R ;

LEXICON св_1a_13_R_Impи
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_R_Impи ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_R
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_R_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_R_Impи ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_ать
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_ать_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_Impи ;

LEXICON св_6a?_ать
св_нп_6a_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a?_ать_Impи
св_нп_6a_ать_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_Impи ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_сыпать
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Imper_unstressed ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<ем # ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut: PresFut_сыпать_Fac ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ать_R_сыпаться
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_1_mut_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Imper_unstressed_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:%^M%<емся # ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut: PresFut_сыпаться_Fac ;

LEXICON св_6a_а́ть
св_6a?_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a?_а́ть
св_нп_6a_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_mut_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ять
св_6a?_ять ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a_ять_R
+V+Perf+IV:я Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_6a_ять
+V+Perf+IV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_6a?_ять
св_нп_6a_ять ;
+V+Perf+TV:я Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6°a_ать_деепр._ая
+V+Impf+IV:а Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_noVA ;
+V+Impf+IV:а PresVrbAdv_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать
св_нп_6°a_ать ;
+V+Perf+TV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_6°a_ать
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать_R
+V+Perf+IV:а Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать_буд._вы/зову,_ет_повел._и
+V+Perf+IV:ва Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ов Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ов Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать_R_буд._вы/зов|усь,_ется
+V+Perf+IV:ва Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ов Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать_(е)рать
+V+Perf+IV:ра Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ра Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ер Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ра PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°a_ать_R_(е)раться
+V+Perf+IV:ра Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON нсв_6°b_а́ть
нсв_нп_6°b_а́ть ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6°b_а́ть_деепр._затрудн.
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_VAPrb ;

LEXICON нсв_6°bs_сла́ть ! деепр._затрудн.
нсв_нп_6°b_сла́ть ; ! деепр._затрудн.
+V+Impf+TV:сла́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:шл Impf_Pres_1_end_VAPrb ;
!+V+Impf+TV:сла́ PastPass ; ! TODO problematic past pass ppl

LEXICON нсв_нп_6°b_сла́ть ! деепр._затрудн.
+V+Impf+IV:сла́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:шл Impf_Pres_1_end_VAPrb ;

LEXICON нсв_6°b_а́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6°b_а́ть
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_6°b_я́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:я́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_6°b_я́ть
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:я́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:я PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°b_я́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:я́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_6°b_а́ть
св_6°b?_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°b_а́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_6°b_а́ть
+V+Perf+IV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_6°b?_а́ть
св_нп_6°b_а́ть ;
+V+Perf+TV:а́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_6°b_а́ть_(о)вать
+V+Perf+IV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ов Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ов Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ва PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_6°b_а́ть_слать
+V+Perf+IV:сла́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:шл Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:сла́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:шл Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:сла PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_6°b/cs_а́ть_деепр._затрудн.
нсв_нп_6°b/cs_а́ть_деепр._затрудн. ;
+V+Impf+TV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass_VAPrb ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_6°b/cs_а́ть_деепр._затрудн.
+V+Impf+IV:а́ Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_end_VAPrb ;
