src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
тыкать:ты́к нсв_6a/1a_13 "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
тыкаться:ты́к нсв_6a/1a_13_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
колебаться:коле́б нсв_6a_а́ть_R "weight: 3.209173923636437" ;
кликать:кли́к нсв_6a_ать "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
прятать:пря́т нсв_6a_ать "weight: 2.5514327506623578" ;
резаться:ре́з нсв_6a_ать_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
плакаться:пла́к нсв_6a_ать_R ;
сыпаться:сы́п нсв_6a_ать_R_сыпаться "weight: 2.304278135781231" ;
сыпать:сы́п нсв_6a_ать_сыпать "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
чаять:ча́ нсв_6a_ять "weight: 2.12818687672555" ;
чуять:чу́ нсв_6a_ять "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
маяться:ма́ нсв_6a_ять_R "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
надеяться:наде́ нсв_6a_ять_R "weight: 2.6264974305151503" ;
колебать:коле́б нсв_6a?_а́ть_имеется_прич._страд._наст. "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
орать:о́р нсв_6°b_а́ть "weight: 3.225096889733606" ;
сосать:со́с нсв_6°b_а́ть "weight: 2.450406171459469" ;
смеяться:сме́ нсв_6°b_я́ть_R "weight: 3.46962140130369" ;
врать:вр нсв_6°b/cs_а́ть_деепр._затрудн. "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
слать: нсв_6°bs_сла́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
мурлыкать:мурлы́к нсв_нп_6a/1a_13 "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
турлыкать:турлы́к нсв_нп_6a/1a_13 ;
плакать:пла́к нсв_нп_6a_ать "weight: 3.4011881487892874" ;
пыхать:пы́х нсв_нп_6a_ать "weight: 2.58303173673406" ;
таять:та́ нсв_нп_6a_ять "weight: 2.9732849167398068" ;
блеять:бле́ нсв_нп_6a_ять "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
жаждать:жа́жд нсв_нп_6°a_ать_деепр._ая "weight: 3.637389399056653" ;
ржать:рж нсв_нп_6°b_а́ть_деепр._затрудн. "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
лгать:лг нсв_нп_6°b/cs_а́ть_деепр._затрудн. "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
выполоскать:в%^Yполоск св_6a/1a_13 "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
потыкать:поты́к св_6a/1a_13 ;
выполоскаться:в%^Yполоск св_6a/1a_13_R ;
расхныкаться:расхны́к св_6a/1a_13_R ;
поколебаться:поколе́б св_6a_а́ть_R "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
всколебаться:всколе́б св_6a_а́ть_R ;
срезать:сре́з св_6a_ать "weight: 3.2520385176926356" ;
запрятать:запря́т св_6a_ать "weight: 3.0472649691016236" ;
обрезаться:обре́з св_6a_ать_R "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
вычесаться:в%^Yчес св_6a_ать_R ;
пересыпаться:пересы́п св_6a_ать_R_сыпаться "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
просыпаться:просы́п св_6a_ать_R_сыпаться "weight: 2.719251483752049" ;
проехаться:прое́ св_6a_ать_R_-ехаться "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
разъехаться:разъе́ св_6a_ать_R_-ехаться "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
выслать:в%^Y св_6a_ать_выслать "weight: 3.553068513356617" ;
осыпать:осы́п св_6a_ать_сыпать "weight: 3.0230565334708026" ;
усыпать:усы́п св_6a_ать_сыпать "weight: 3.6124867160723357" ;
охаять:оха́ св_6a_ять ;
отвеять:отве́ св_6a_ять "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
умаяться:ума́ св_6a_ять_R "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
почуяться:почу́ св_6a_ять_R ;
заколебать:заколе́б св_6a?_а́ть "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
выткать:в%^Yтк св_6°a_ать "weight: 2.5753449080677693" ;
высосать:в%^Yсос св_6°a_ать "weight: 2.9027038424540996" ;
вырваться:в%^Yрв св_6°a_ать_R "weight: 3.3350127527573994" ;
выткаться:в%^Yтк св_6°a_ать_R ;
выдраться:в%^Yд св_6°a_ать_R_(е)раться "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
вызваться:в%^Yз св_6°a_ать_R_буд._вы/зов|усь,_ется "weight: 2.105910482014398" ;
выдрать:в%^Yд св_6°a_ать_(е)рать "weight: 2.666005971798824" ;
вызвать:в%^Yз св_6°a_ать_буд._вы/зову,_ет_повел._и "weight: 4.60725807252948" ;
повыдрать:пов%^Yд св_6°a_ать_(е)рать ;
засосать:засо́с св_6°b_а́ть "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ;
дососаться:досос св_6°b_а́ть_R ;
воззвать:во́зз св_6°b_а́ть_(о)вать "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
предпослать:предпо́ св_6°b_а́ть_слать "weight: 2.439940737781304" ;
просмеять:просме́ св_6°b_я́ть ;
просмеяться:просме́ св_6°b_я́ть_R ;
помурлыкать:помурлы́к св_нп_6a/1a_13 ;
прохныкать:прохны́к св_нп_6a/1a_13 ;
поплакать:попла́к св_нп_6a_ать "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
покудахтать:покуда́хт св_нп_6a_ать ;
протаять:прота́ св_нп_6a_ять "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
поблеять:побле́ св_нп_6a_ять ;
возжаждать:возжа́жд св_нп_6°a_ать "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
наорать:наор св_нп_6°b_а́ть ;
